src/third_party/hunspell/tests/morph.aff
# example for morphological analysis, stemming and generation
PFX P Y 1
PFX P   0 un . dp:pfx_un sp:un

SFX S Y 1
SFX S   0 s . is:plur

SFX Q Y 1
SFX Q   0 s . is:sg_3

SFX R Y 1
SFX R   0 able/PS . ds:der_able
