src/third_party/hunspell/tests/morph.good
drink
drinks
drinkable
drinkables
undrinkable
undrinkables
drank
drunk
phenomenon
phenomena
drink eat
drink eats
drink ate
drink eaten
drink eatable
drink eatables
drink phenomena
drinks eat
drinks eats
drinks ate
drinks eaten
drinks eatable
drinks eatables
drinks phenomena
undrinkable phenomena
phenomenon drinks
